Missouri, session 2026, SB1513.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.067, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 537.067,
to read as follows:
537.067. 1. In all tort actions for damages, [if a
defendant is found to bear fifty-one percent or more of
fault, then such defendant shall be jointly and severally
liable for the amount of the judgment rendered against the
defendants. If a defendant is found to bear less than fifty-
one percent of fault, then the defendant shall only be
responsible for the percentage of the judgment for which the
defendant is determined to be responsible by the trier of
fact; except that, a party is responsible for the fault of
another defendant or for payment of the proportionate share
of another defendant if any of the following applies:
(1) The other defendant was acting as an employee of
the party;
(2) The party's liability for the fault of another
person arises out of a duty created by the federal
Employers' Liability Act, 45 U.S.C. Section 51.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1513 2
2. The defendants shall only be severally liable for
the percentage of punitive damages for which fault is
attributed to such defendant by the trier of fact.
3.] the liability of each defendant for damages shall
be several and shall not be joint. Each defendant shall be
liable only for the amount of damages allocated to that
defendant in direct proportion to that defendant's
percentage of fault. A separate several judgment shall be
rendered against that defendant for that amount. If a
plaintiff is found to bear fifty-one percent or more of the
fault to the action, then the plaintiff shall be barred from
the recovery of any damages for the action.
2. To determine the amount of damages to be entered
against each defendant in accordance with subsection 1 of
this section, the trier of fact shall calculate the
following:
(1) The total amount of damages a plaintiff would have
been entitled to recover absent any fault to be proportioned
to such plaintiff;
(2) The percentage of fault of each party, including
any fault that is attributable to the plaintiff, and all
other persons or entities who contributed to the alleged
injury or damages, regardless of whether the person or
entity was, or could have been, named as a party to the
action; and
(3) Multiply the total amount of damages recoverable
by the plaintiff by the percentage of each defendant's fault.
3. The amount of damages calculated pursuant to
subsection 2 of this section for a defendant shall be the
maximum recoverable against that defendant.
4. Assessments of percentages of fault of nonparties
shall be used only in the determination of the percentage of

SB 1513 3
fault of named parties. Where fault is assessed against
nonparties under this section, findings of fact shall not
subject any nonparty to liability in any action or be
introduced as evidence of liability in any action.
5. In all tort actions, no party may disclose to the
trier of fact the impact of this section. The court shall
instruct the jury on the application of this section,
including the determination of a plaintiff's percentage of
fault, a defendant's percentage of fault, and the bar to
recovery if the plaintiff is found to bear fifty-one percent
or more of the fault.
✓